Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1262.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3804(c.3) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3804. Penalties.* * *(c.3) Sentencing enhancement.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement for [a]:(1) A violation of section 3802(a)(1) where the individual refused testing of breath or chemical testing pursuant to a valid search warrant, court order or any other basis permissible by the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania [or for a].123456789101112131415161718 (2) A violation of section 3802(c) or (d) and where the individual has four or more prior offenses.(3) A violation of section 3802(f) where the driver of a school bus or school vehicle was convicted for operating a school bus or school vehicle with an illegal amount of alcohol, controlled substance or both, in the course of official duties, including when the driver is in route without passengers on board.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1262PN1567 - 2 - 12345678910